src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Norwegian Nynorsk language
! Copyright © 2015 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
! !!            !!!Norwegian Nynorsk morphological analyser                  !
! ========================================================================== !
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Norwegian Nynorsk LANGUAGE.

! ==========================
! LEXICA FOR ADJECTIVE ROOTS
! ==========================

! Basic paradigms
! ===============

! Ordbank mapping: 501, 535, 540, 541, 550, 551, 553, 570, 571, 575, 575G, 611 -> a1
LEXICON a1 ! 
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-neuter ;
 +A: a-grade ;

! Ordbank mapping: 510, 511 -> a2
LEXICON a2 ! 
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-no-neuter ;
 +A: a-grade ;

! Ordbank mapping: 515, 532 -> a3
LEXICON a3 ! 
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-no-neuter ;

! Sublexica
! =========

LEXICON positive
 +Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Pl+Def:%>e # ;

LEXICON a-neuter ! fint
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>Q3t # ;

LEXICON a-no-neuter ! vennlig
 +Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;

! Ordbank mapping: 629, 654 -> a-grade
LEXICON a-grade
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;

LEXICON 500
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;

LEXICON 502
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>é # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>é # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ee # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ee # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>é # ;
 +Comp:%>eare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>east # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>easte # ;

LEXICON 519
 +Comp:%>verre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>verst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>verste # ;

LEXICON 520
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>ste # ;

LEXICON 529
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Sg+Def:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;

LEXICON 530
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;

LEXICON 531
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Sg+Def:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;

LEXICON 533
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Sg+Def:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;

LEXICON 556
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>is # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>is # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>se # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>se # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ist # ;

LEXICON 558
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;

LEXICON 560
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>ste # ;

LEXICON 564
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ene # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ene # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;

LEXICON 564T
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ene # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ene # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ent # ;

LEXICON 572
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 572G
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;

LEXICON 572T
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ent # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 573
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 577
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 577T
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ent # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 583
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;

LEXICON 583T
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ent # ;

LEXICON 585
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>en # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>gne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>gne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Comp:%>gnare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>gnast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>gnaste # ;

LEXICON 593
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>dd # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>dd # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>dde # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>dde # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;

LEXICON 595
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>vd # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>vd # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>vde # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>vde # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>tt # ;

LEXICON 598
 +Pl+Indef:%>fåe # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>fåe # ;
 +Comp:%>færre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>færrast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>færraste # ;

LEXICON 599
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>an # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>an # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ne # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ne # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>an # ;
 +Comp:%>nare # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>nast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>naste # ;

LEXICON 601
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>lang # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>lang # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>lange # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>lange # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>langt # ;
 +Comp:%>lengre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>lengst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>lengste # ;

LEXICON 602
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>stor # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>stor # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>store # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>store # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>stort # ;
 +Comp:%>større # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>størst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>største # ;

LEXICON 603
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>u # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>ue # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>ue # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>ut # ;
 +Comp:%>yre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>yst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>yste # ;

LEXICON 607
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>bra # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>bra # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>bra # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>bra # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>bra # ;
 +Comp:%>betre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>best # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>beste # ;

LEXICON 609
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>d # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>d # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>de # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>de # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t # ;

LEXICON 610
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>gammal # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>gammal # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>gamle # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>gamle # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>gammalt # ;
 +Comp:%>eldre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>eldst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>eldste # ;

LEXICON 612
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>god # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>god # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>gode # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>gode # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>godt # ;
 +Comp:%>betre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>best # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>beste # ;

LEXICON 616
 +Pl+Indef:%>mange # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>mange # ;
 +Comp:%>fleire # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>flest # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>fleste # ;

LEXICON 618
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>mykje # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>mykje # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>mykje # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>mykje # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>mykje # ;
 +Comp:%>meir # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>mest # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>meste # ;

LEXICON 623
 +Comp:%>re # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>ste # ;

LEXICON 625
 +Comp:%>indre # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>inst # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>inste # ;

LEXICON 628
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Comp:%>are # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;

LEXICON 630
 +Comp:%>re # ;
 +Superl+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Def:%>aste # ;
