src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
atthavd+A:attha 595 ; ! LEMMA_ID=3512
bortre+A:bort 630 ; ! LEMMA_ID=9162
bra+A:b 607 ; ! LEMMA_ID=9350
durkdriven+A:durkdriv 573 ; ! LEMMA_ID=15832
einsam+A:einsam a1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=17161
einstø+A:einstø 531 ; ! LEMMA_ID=17238
emiratarabisk+A:emiratarabisk a2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124237
enerverande+A:enerverande a3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135169
fabrikkny+A:fabrikkny 530 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136406
fake+A:fak 628 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137641
fattigfornem+A:fattigfornem 560 ; ! LEMMA_ID=20184
fisfornem+A:fisfornem 560 ; ! LEMMA_ID=21816
fjaklen+A:fjakl 564T ; ! LEMMA_ID=21999
flåsen+A:flås 572T ; ! LEMMA_ID=23508
forkava+A:forkava 533 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24446
fornem+A:fornem 560 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24757
forskoren+A:forskor 572G ; ! LEMMA_ID=24978
fræv+A:fræv 500 ; ! LEMMA_ID=27112
få+A:f 598 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115438
gammal+A:gammal 610 ; ! LEMMA_ID=29113
gassforma+A:gassforma a3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=29532
giglen+A:gigl 564 ; ! LEMMA_ID=30143
gjeldstyngd+A:gjeldstyng 609 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136832
gjørmen+A:gjørm 572 ; ! LEMMA_ID=30902
glæ+A:glæ 530 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31347
god+A:god 612 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31557
gurmen+A:gurm 572T ; ! LEMMA_ID=33662
hallen+A:hal 577 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34304
haram+A:haram 533 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124631
heilag+A:heilag 520 ; ! LEMMA_ID=35925
heimedøypt+A:heimedøypt a2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=36067
hitre+A:hit 630 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115025
homofob+A:homofob a1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137817
hynen+A:hyne 583T ; ! LEMMA_ID=39088
hånen+A:håne 583T ; ! LEMMA_ID=40072
indiskré+A:indiskr 533 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40862
indre+A:in 625 ; ! LEMMA_ID=40898
inneten+A:innet 572G ; ! LEMMA_ID=41359
innhavd+A:innha 595 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41453
innslegen+A:innsleg 573 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41708
jarnslegen+A:jarnsleg 573 ; ! LEMMA_ID=42870
joulesk+A:joulesk 500 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123584
kippskodd+A:kippsko 593 ; ! LEMMA_ID=45881
kverven+A:kverv 572 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52825
lang+A:l 601 ; ! LEMMA_ID=54057
loppen+A:lop 577 ; ! LEMMA_ID=56721
læ+A:læ 531 ; ! LEMMA_ID=57928
mange+A:mange 616 ; ! LEMMA_ID=117178
medhavd+A:medha 595 ; ! LEMMA_ID=59883
momentan+A:momentan 500 ; ! LEMMA_ID=61770
mykje+A:m 618 ; ! LEMMA_ID=62714
nedkøyrd+A:nedkøyr 609 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64172
nedre+A:ned 623 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64191
nysila+A:nysila a3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=65464
omspunnen+A:omspunne 583 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66725
oppdriven+A:oppdriv 572G ; ! LEMMA_ID=67000
ordstø+A:ordstø 531 ; ! LEMMA_ID=67695
ovmykje+A:ovm 618 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68517
passé+A:pass 502 ; ! LEMMA_ID=69250
påvørd+A:påvørd a1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=72841
radvint+A:radvint a2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=73019
regngrå+A:regngrå 530 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128603
riglen+A:rigl 564T ; ! LEMMA_ID=75057
sakte+A:sakt 628 ; ! LEMMA_ID=77022
sangren+A:sangr 564 ; ! LEMMA_ID=77794
sirkumpolar+A:sirkumpolar 500 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124362
sjeldan+A:sjeld 599 ; ! LEMMA_ID=80403
skadmykje+A:skadm 618 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81173
skarven+A:skarv 572T ; ! LEMMA_ID=81503
skjelven+A:skjelv 572 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82403
sleinen+A:sleine 583 ; ! LEMMA_ID=85454
smøyen+A:smøy 585 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86460
snacksy+A:snacksy 533 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137862
spildren+A:spildr 564 ; ! LEMMA_ID=88369
stor+A:st 602 ; ! LEMMA_ID=90269
stormannsgalen+A:stormannsgal 572G ; ! LEMMA_ID=90365
strikte+A:strikt 628 ; ! LEMMA_ID=90938
stumren+A:stumr 564T ; ! LEMMA_ID=91338
tankespreidd+A:tankesprei 593 ; ! LEMMA_ID=94637
trestemd+A:trestem 609 ; ! LEMMA_ID=98879
tru+A:tru 530 ; ! LEMMA_ID=99636
tung+A:t 603 ; ! LEMMA_ID=100418
tunglasta+A:tunglasta a3 ; ! LEMMA_ID=100474
tvegen+A:tveg 572 ; ! LEMMA_ID=101093
tyrren+A:tyr 577 ; ! LEMMA_ID=101734
ufredt+A:ufredt 558 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115405
uheilag+A:uheilag 520 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131919
undre+A:und 623 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104302
ung+A:ung 603 ; ! LEMMA_ID=104334
vadren+A:vadr 564T ; ! LEMMA_ID=107030
valen+A:val 572T ; ! LEMMA_ID=107254
velbudd+A:velbu 593 ; ! LEMMA_ID=108983
venezuelansk+A:venezuelansk a2 ; ! LEMMA_ID=109291
verre+A:ver 519 ; ! LEMMA_ID=110286
vinglen+A:vingl 564 ; ! LEMMA_ID=111369
vætefull+A:vætefull a1 ; ! LEMMA_ID=112601
vønen+A:vøne 583T ; ! LEMMA_ID=112615
ybben+A:yb 577T ; ! LEMMA_ID=113072
ymis+A:ym 556 ; ! LEMMA_ID=113112
åtfunnen+A:åtfunne 583 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114854
ørsmå+A:ørsmå 529 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115432
ørung+A:ør 603 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114008
øvre+A:øv 623 ; ! LEMMA_ID=114055
